src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 453 Y 7
SFX 453 anj anj
SFX 453 anj nja
SFX 453 anj nju
SFX 453 anj nje
SFX 453 anj njem
SFX 453 anj si
SFX 453 anj sima

SFX 454 Y 4
SFX 454 i i
SFX 454 i eg
SFX 454 i em
SFX 454 i im

SFX 455 Y 7
SFX 455 h h
SFX 455 h ha
SFX 455 h hu
SFX 455 h še
SFX 455 h hom
SFX 455 h si
SFX 455 h sima

SFX 456 Y 4
SFX 456 ci ci
SFX 456 ci ka
SFX 456 ci ke
SFX 456 ci cima

SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 e e

SFX 458 Y 4
SFX 458 i i
SFX 458 i a
SFX 458 i e
SFX 458 i ima

SFX 459 Y 3
SFX 459 e e
SFX 459 e a
SFX 459 e ima

SFX 460 Y 7
SFX 460 ć ć
SFX 460 ć ća
SFX 460 ć ću
SFX 460 ć će
SFX 460 ć ćom
SFX 460 ć ći
SFX 460 ć ćima

SFX 461 Y 7
SFX 461 č č
SFX 461 č ča
SFX 461 č ču
SFX 461 č čom
SFX 461 č či
SFX 461 č čima
SFX 461 č če

SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 o o

SFX 463 Y 6
SFX 463 o o
SFX 463 o a
SFX 463 o u
SFX 463 o om
SFX 463 o ama
SFX 463 o e

SFX 464 Y 5
SFX 464 nj nj
SFX 464 nj nja
SFX 464 nj nju
SFX 464 nj nje
SFX 464 nj njom

SFX 465 Y 9
SFX 465 š š
SFX 465 š ša
SFX 465 š šu
SFX 465 š še
SFX 465 š šem
SFX 465 š šovi
SFX 465 š šova
SFX 465 š šovima
SFX 465 š šove

SFX 466 Y 5
SFX 466 o o
SFX 466 o e
SFX 466 o o
SFX 466 o u
SFX 466 o om

SFX 467 Y 4
SFX 467 e e
SFX 467 e a
SFX 467 e u
SFX 467 e ima

SFX 468 Y 3
SFX 468 e a
SFX 468 e e
SFX 468 e ama

SFX 469 Y 8
SFX 469 n n
SFX 469 n na
SFX 469 n nu
SFX 469 n nom
SFX 469 n novi
SFX 469 n nova
SFX 469 n novima
SFX 469 n nove

SFX 470 Y 4
SFX 470 de de
SFX 470 de deta
SFX 470 de detu
SFX 470 de detom

SFX 471 Y 8
SFX 471 d d
SFX 471 d du
SFX 471 d da
SFX 471 d dom
SFX 471 d dovi
SFX 471 d dova
SFX 471 d dovima
SFX 471 d dove

SFX 472 Y 8
SFX 472 d d
SFX 472 d da
SFX 472 d du
SFX 472 d de
SFX 472 d dom
SFX 472 d di
SFX 472 d da
SFX 472 d dima

SFX 473 Y 9
SFX 473 č č
SFX 473 č ča
SFX 473 č ču
SFX 473 č če
SFX 473 č čom
SFX 473 č čovi
SFX 473 č čova
SFX 473 č čovima
SFX 473 č čove

SFX 474 Y 9
SFX 474 š š
SFX 474 š ša
SFX 474 š šu
SFX 474 š še
SFX 474 š šom
SFX 474 š šovi
SFX 474 š šova
SFX 474 š šovima
SFX 474 š šove

SFX 475 Y 4
SFX 475 ljo ljo
SFX 475 ljo lja
SFX 475 ljo lju
SFX 475 ljo ljom

SFX 476 Y 9
SFX 476 t n
SFX 476 t na
SFX 476 t nu
SFX 476 t ne
SFX 476 t nom
SFX 476 t novi
SFX 476 t nova
SFX 476 t novima
SFX 476 t nove

SFX 477 Y 7
SFX 477 g g
SFX 477 g ga
SFX 477 g gu
SFX 477 g že
SFX 477 g gom
SFX 477 g zi
SFX 477 g zima

SFX 478 Y 7
SFX 478 o o
SFX 478 o a
SFX 478 o u
SFX 478 o om
SFX 478 o i
SFX 478 o ama
SFX 478 o e

SFX 479 Y 4
SFX 479 si s
SFX 479 si ha
SFX 479 si sima
SFX 479 si he

SFX 480 Y 8
SFX 480 ć ć
SFX 480 ć ća
SFX 480 ć ću
SFX 480 ć ćem
SFX 480 ć ćevi
SFX 480 ć ćeva
SFX 480 ć ćevima
SFX 480 ć ćeve

SFX 481 Y 3
SFX 481 ce e
SFX 481 ce a
SFX 481 ce ama

SFX 482 Y 4
SFX 482 o o
SFX 482 o og
SFX 482 o om
SFX 482 o im

SFX 483 Y 8
SFX 483 s s
SFX 483 s sa
SFX 483 s su
SFX 483 s se
SFX 483 s sovi
SFX 483 s sova
SFX 483 s sovima
SFX 483 s sove

SFX 484 Y 6
SFX 484 a a
SFX 484 a e
SFX 484 a i
SFX 484 a u
SFX 484 a om
SFX 484 a ama

SFX 485 Y 6
SFX 485 i i
SFX 485 i ija
SFX 485 i iju
SFX 485 i ijem
SFX 485 i ije
SFX 485 i ijima

SFX 486 Y 8
SFX 486 s s
SFX 486 s sa
SFX 486 s su
SFX 486 s som
SFX 486 s si
SFX 486 s sa
SFX 486 s sima
SFX 486 s se

SFX 487 Y 4
SFX 487 c c
SFX 487 c ca
SFX 487 c cu
SFX 487 c com

SFX 488 Y 4
SFX 488 ce e
SFX 488 ce eta
SFX 488 ce etu
SFX 488 ce etom

SFX 489 Y 5
SFX 489 š š
SFX 489 š ša
SFX 489 š šu
SFX 489 š še
SFX 489 š šom

SFX 490 Y 5
SFX 490 k k
SFX 490 k ka
SFX 490 k ku
SFX 490 k ke
SFX 490 k kom

SFX 491 Y 3
SFX 491 ke ke
SFX 491 ke ka
SFX 491 ke cima

SFX 492 Y 4
SFX 492 đ đ
SFX 492 đ đa
SFX 492 đ đu
SFX 492 đ đem

SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 n n

SFX 494 Y 5
SFX 494 o o
SFX 494 o oa
SFX 494 o ou
SFX 494 o oe
SFX 494 o oom

SFX 495 Y 6
SFX 495 ka ka
SFX 495 ka kih
SFX 495 ka kim
SFX 495 ka ko
SFX 495 ka kog
SFX 495 ka kom

SFX 496 Y 5
SFX 496 e e
SFX 496 e i
SFX 496 e u
SFX 496 e a
SFX 496 e ama

SFX 497 Y 4
SFX 497 e e
SFX 497 e a
SFX 497 e ama
SFX 497 e i

SFX 498 Y 7
SFX 498 ce e
SFX 498 ce ea
SFX 498 ce eu
SFX 498 ce eom
SFX 498 ce ei
SFX 498 ce eima
SFX 498 ce ee

SFX 499 Y 8
SFX 499 n n
SFX 499 n na
SFX 499 n nu
SFX 499 n nom
SFX 499 n nevi
SFX 499 n neva
SFX 499 n nevima
SFX 499 n neve

SFX 500 Y 7
SFX 500 nj nj
SFX 500 nj nja
SFX 500 nj nju
SFX 500 nj nje
SFX 500 nj njom
SFX 500 nj nji
SFX 500 nj njima

SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 m m

SFX 502 Y 9
SFX 502 š š
SFX 502 š ša
SFX 502 š šu
SFX 502 š še
SFX 502 š šom
SFX 502 š ševi
SFX 502 š ševa
SFX 502 š ševiša
SFX 502 š ševe

SFX 503 Y 7
SFX 503 u u
SFX 503 u ua
SFX 503 u uu
SFX 503 u uom
SFX 503 u uovi
SFX 503 u uovima
SFX 503 u uove

SFX 504 Y 4
SFX 504 oci oci
SFX 504 oci laca
SFX 504 oci ocima
SFX 504 oci oce

SFX 505 Y 8
SFX 505 š š
SFX 505 š ša
SFX 505 š šu
SFX 505 š šem
SFX 505 š ševi
SFX 505 š ševa
SFX 505 š ševima
SFX 505 š ševe

SFX 506 Y 9
SFX 506 lj lj
SFX 506 lj lja
SFX 506 lj lju
SFX 506 lj lje
SFX 506 lj ljom
SFX 506 lj ljovi
SFX 506 lj ljova
SFX 506 lj ljovima
SFX 506 lj ljove

SFX 507 Y 4
SFX 507 te e
SFX 507 te eta
SFX 507 te etu
SFX 507 te etom

SFX 508 Y 6
SFX 508 o o
SFX 508 o oa
SFX 508 o ou
SFX 508 o oe
SFX 508 o oom
SFX 508 o oima

SFX 509 Y 5
SFX 509 e e
SFX 509 e ea
SFX 509 e eu
SFX 509 e eom
SFX 509 e eima

SFX 510 Y 7
SFX 510 n n
SFX 510 n na
SFX 510 n nu
SFX 510 n nom
SFX 510 n ni
SFX 510 n nima
SFX 510 n ne

SFX 511 Y 8
SFX 511 ak k
SFX 511 ak ka
SFX 511 ak ku
SFX 511 ak kom
SFX 511 ak kovi
SFX 511 ak kova
SFX 511 ak kovima
SFX 511 ak kove

SFX 512 Y 4
SFX 512 be e
SFX 512 be eta
SFX 512 be etu
SFX 512 be etom

SFX 513 Y 5
SFX 513 n n
SFX 513 n na
SFX 513 n nu
SFX 513 n ne
SFX 513 n nom

SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 dž dž

SFX 515 Y 4
SFX 515 ci ci
SFX 515 ci taka
SFX 515 ci ke
SFX 515 ci cima

SFX 516 Y 4
SFX 516 lji lji
SFX 516 lji lja
SFX 516 lji ljima
SFX 516 lji lje

SFX 517 Y 7
SFX 517 i i
SFX 517 i og
SFX 517 i om
SFX 517 i im
SFX 517 i ima
SFX 517 i ih
SFX 517 i e

SFX 518 Y 4
SFX 518 ci ci
SFX 518 ci taca
SFX 518 ci čeve
SFX 518 ci cima

SFX 519 Y 8
SFX 519 l l
SFX 519 l la
SFX 519 l lu
SFX 519 l le
SFX 519 l lom
SFX 519 l li
SFX 519 l lima
SFX 519 l le

SFX 520 Y 8
SFX 520 ž ž
SFX 520 ž ža
SFX 520 ž žu
SFX 520 ž že
SFX 520 ž žem
SFX 520 ž ži
SFX 520 ž žima
SFX 520 ž že

SFX 521 Y 3
SFX 521 i a
SFX 521 i e
SFX 521 i ima

SFX 522 Y 3
SFX 522 ž i
SFX 522 ž e
SFX 522 ž ima

SFX 523 Y 9
SFX 523 č č
SFX 523 č ča
SFX 523 č ču
SFX 523 č če
SFX 523 č čom
SFX 523 č čevi
SFX 523 č čeva
SFX 523 č čevima
SFX 523 č čeve

SFX 524 Y 6
SFX 524 o o
SFX 524 o a
SFX 524 o u
SFX 524 o i
SFX 524 o ima
SFX 524 o e

SFX 525 Y 7
SFX 525 c c
SFX 525 c ca
SFX 525 c cu
SFX 525 c ce
SFX 525 c com
SFX 525 c ci
SFX 525 c covima

SFX 526 Y 9
SFX 526 nj nj
SFX 526 nj nja
SFX 526 nj nju
SFX 526 nj nje
SFX 526 nj njom
SFX 526 nj njevi
SFX 526 nj njeva
SFX 526 nj njevima
SFX 526 nj njeve

SFX 527 Y 8
SFX 527 nj nj
SFX 527 nj nja
SFX 527 nj nju
SFX 527 nj nje
SFX 527 nj njevi
SFX 527 nj njeva
SFX 527 nj njevima
SFX 527 nj njeve

SFX 528 Y 4
SFX 528 se e
SFX 528 se eta
SFX 528 se etu
SFX 528 se etom

SFX 529 Y 4
SFX 529 lji lji
SFX 529 lji alja
SFX 529 lji ljima
SFX 529 lji lje

SFX 530 Y 4
SFX 530 e e
SFX 530 e a
SFX 530 e u
SFX 530 e ama

SFX 531 Y 4
SFX 531 me e
SFX 531 me eta
SFX 531 me etu
SFX 531 me etom

SFX 532 Y 4
SFX 532 ci ci
SFX 532 ci aka
SFX 532 ci ke
SFX 532 ci cima

SFX 533 Y 9
SFX 533 b b
SFX 533 b ba
SFX 533 b bu
SFX 533 b be
SFX 533 b bom
SFX 533 b bovi
SFX 533 b bova
SFX 533 b bovima
SFX 533 b bovr

SFX 534 Y 9
SFX 534 š dž
SFX 534 š dža
SFX 534 š džu
SFX 534 š dže
SFX 534 š džom
SFX 534 š dževi
SFX 534 š dževa
SFX 534 š dževima
SFX 534 š dževe

SFX 535 Y 5
SFX 535 o o
SFX 535 o a
SFX 535 o u
SFX 535 o e
SFX 535 o ama

SFX 536 Y 16
SFX 536 n nac
SFX 536 n nca
SFX 536 n ncu
SFX 536 n nče
SFX 536 n ncem
SFX 536 n nci
SFX 536 n naca
SFX 536 n ncima
SFX 536 n nce
SFX 536 n nka
SFX 536 n nke
SFX 536 n nki
SFX 536 n nku
SFX 536 n nko
SFX 536 n nkom
SFX 536 n nkama
