src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
Arlington/536
Badnji/454
Bamako/462
Baruh/455
Baščeluci/456
Beljin/536
Beoci/458
Berane/459
Bečanj/453
Bidgošć/460
Bidgošč/461
Bilo/462
Bisao/462
Bovanj/453
Bokačo/463
Boljetin/536
Bordo/462
Borneo/462
Bohinj/464
Boš/465
Bošnjo/466
Brgule/467
Brenjo/466
Brzohode/468
Briješće/457
Britn/469
Bubanj/453
Bude/470
Vaznesenje/457
Vajld/471
Vančo/463
Varvarin/536
Varivode/468
Vaskrsenje/457
Velbužd/472
Velč/473
Velš/474
Veljo/475
Viganj/453
Vingt/476
Vinipeg/477
Vico/478
Vlade/470
Vlaole/467
Vlasi/479
Vlać/480
Vlačo/463
Voganj/453
Vodanj/453
Vodice/481
Volš/474
Voren/536
Vorld/471
Vrbovsko/462
Vrbovsko/482
Vreoci/458
Vuds/483
Vučo/463
Galaci/458
Galoa/484
Gaće/457
Gaudenci/485
Gaco/478
Gerets/486
Gec/487
Gnjilane/459
Gold/471
Golovode/468
Goražde/468
Gornji/454
Goce/488
Gramš/489
Grgeteg/477
Gredetin/536
Grinsboro/462
Guld/471
Davičo/463
Dedinje/457
Dejton/536
Delakroa/484
Dečane/459
Dimčo/463
Dobrodo/462
Dobrotin/536
Donjeck/490
Dragobužde/468
Dražanj/453
Draškoci/485
Drijetanj/453
Dujke/491
Đerađ/492
Đorde/470
Đurađ/492
Everts/486
Elejn/493
Elijade/468
Elfride/457
Elfride/468
Erebro/462
Ermosiljo/475
Erceg/477
Esen/536
Žo/494
Zalaegerseg/477
Zalug/477
Zaostro/462
Zelenortska/495
Zeljug/477
Zeoke/491
Zec/487
Zmijanje/457
Zoe/496
Izbičanj/453
Inke/497
Jajce/457
Jamusukro/462
Jangce/498
Jančo/463
Janjo/466
Jaren/536
Jastrebarsko/462
Jastrebarsko/482
Jedrene/457
Jedrene/459
Jezero/462
Joco/478
Kabiljo/475
Kazanj/453
Kakanj/453
Kalanj/453
Kanjuh/455
Karabeg/477
Kasindo/462
Katovice/481
Kać/480
Keln/499
Kemenj/500
Keretaro/462
Kilin/536
Kim/501
Kito/462
Kiš/502
Kju/503
Kladanj/453
Kovizle/467
Kovioci/504
Koeljo/475
Kolombo/462
Konjuh/455
Korade/468
Koretin/536
Kočo/463
Košice/481
Kranj/453
Kraš/505
Kremlj/506
Krste/507
Krupanj/453
Krčo/463
Kurbin/536
Kurtoa/484
Kusto/508
Kutle/509
Langloa/484
Laole/467
Laci/458
Lašče/457
Lebane/459
Leleg/477
Leskoa/484
Lec/487
Leštane/459
Libražd/472
Lids/483
Linkoln/510
Lisabon/536
Loa/484
Lozanj/453
Lopatanj/453
Lošinj/464
Ludbreg/477
Ljiljak/511
Ljube/512
Ljuljaci/456
Ljupčo/463
Mazačo/463
Majnade/457
Majnade/468
Malabo/462
Manajle/467
Mance/498
Mareskoa/484
Marijanska/495
Marijehamn/513
Mardž/514
Masačusets/486
Materice/457
Materice/481
Matičane/459
Madžuro/462
Medison/536
Međo/463
Menade/468
Mengele/509
Menduh/455
Mikele/509
Milčo/463
Mico/478
Miš/502
Mlađo/463
Mleci/515
Monako/462
Monkloa/484
Montenj/500
Morinj/464
Moste/457
Močioci/504
Mršelji/516
Muriljo/475
Murinjo/466
Mutanj/453
Mučanj/453
Navalin/536
Nagoričane/457
Nagoričane/459
Nađ/492
Nakrivanj/453
Našice/481
Neđo/463
Niderle/509
Nižnji/454
Niš/502
Noa/484
Novi/517
Njutn/469
Odense/457
Olandska/495
Oleg/477
Orde/470
Oregon/536
Oslo/462
Osreci/456
Otanj/453
Outs/486
Oci/518
Odžaci/456
Paljo/475
Paramaribo/462
Parke/457
Pasjane/459
Paskvale/509
Perduh/455
Pesoa/484
Peterle/509
Pleven/536
Plzenj/500
Plitvice/481
Po/494
Podmoskovlje/457
Podrug/477
Polače/457
Popokatepetl/519
Popučke/457
Portorož/520
Predole/467
Prekonozi/521
Preoce/457
Progoreoci/504
Pružanj/453
Rable/509
Raguž/522
Rade/470
Radosin/536
Rajč/523
Ranilug/477
Rančo/463
Raco/478
Rinj/464
Roberts/486
Rovinj/464
Rodolfo/524
Rozenkrojc/525
Roskilde/468
Roš/465
Rulfo/524
Runjo/466
Rušanj/453
Samoa/484
Sande/470
Sančo/463
Saporo/462
Sarbriken/536
Sedobro/462
Sendvička/495
Sence/457
Senj/526
Seravale/509
Sibinj/464
Sijetl/519
Siječanj/453
Sikole/467
Sinaloa/484
Sinj/527
Sisak/511
Sju/503
Skenderbeg/477
Skočo/463
Skupljen/536
Slavčo/463
Spase/528
Srblji/529
Sredozemlje/457
Strmosten/536
Suljo/475
Tampere/457
Tanjug/477
Taš/505
Tenerife/459
Tibets/486
Tibužde/468
Tinj/527
Tiodže/530
Tode/470
Tomanj/453
Tome/531
Topusko/462
Tornton/536
Tribrode/468
Troa/484
Trojice/457
Trojice/481
Turci/532
Tušanj/453
Ub/533
Ulcinj/464
Uspenje/457
Farkaždin/536
Farska/495
Feld/471
Fočo/463
Fransoa/484
Franjo/466
Friš/502
Hajts/486
Harare/457
Held/471
Herusci/458
Herceg/477
Hijade/468
Hju/503
Hlebš/534
Cico/478
Crnuzi/521
Cuci/458
Čađo/463
Čajld/471
Čarlston/536
Čačak/511
Česi/479
Čestereg/477
Čile/509
Čičak/511
Čmanjke/491
Čurug/477
Džafo/535
Džejn/493
Džo/494
Džoš/465
Šarloa/484
Šarlroa/484
Šveljo/475
Šenoa/484
Šenj/500
Šilds/483
Šo/494
Špiljak/511
Špinjo/466
